Georgia, session 2025_26, HB841.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) As used in this Act, the term:
(1) "Ad valorem taxes for educational purposes" means all ad valorem taxes for
educational purposes levied by, for, or on behalf of the Pickens County school district,
including, but not limited to, any ad valorem taxes to pay interest on and to retire county
school district bonded indebtedness.
H. B. 841
- 1 -

LC 47 3549/AP
(2) "Homestead" means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended with the additional qualification that it shall include not more
than five contiguous acres of homestead property.
(3) "Income" means gross income from all sources determined pursuant to Chapter 7 of
Title 48 of the O.C.G.A., as amended, for state income tax purposes.
(4) "Senior citizen" means a person who is 62 years of age or older on or before
January 1 of the year in which application for the exemption under subsection (b) of this
section is made.
(b) Each resident of the Pickens County school district who is a senior citizen is granted an
exemption on such person's homestead from Pickens County school district ad valorem taxes
for educational purposes in the amount of $40,000.00 of the assessed value of such
homestead. The exemption under this subsection shall only be granted if such person's
income, together with the income of the spouse who also occupies and resides at such
homestead, does not exceed $40,000.00 for the immediately preceding year. The value of
that property in excess of such exempted amount shall remain subject to taxation.
(c) A person shall not receive the homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this
section unless such person or person's agent files an application with the tax commissioner
of Pickens County, giving such person's age, income, and such additional information
relative to receiving such exemption as will enable the tax commissioner of Pickens County
to make a determination regarding the initial and continuing eligibility of such person for
such exemption. The tax commissioner of Pickens County shall provide application forms
for this purpose.
(d) The exemption shall be claimed and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended. The exemption shall be automatically renewed from year to year
so long as the person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b) of this section
occupies the residence as a homestead. After such person has filed the proper application as
provided in subsection (c) of this section, it shall not be necessary to make application
H. B. 841
- 2 -

LC 47 3549/AP
thereafter for any year, and such exemption shall continue to be allowed to such person. It
shall be the duty of any such person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b)
of this section to notify the tax commissioner of Pickens County in the event that such person
for any reason becomes ineligible for such exemption.
(e) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to or affect any
state ad valorem taxes, county ad valorem taxes for county purposes, municipal ad valorem
taxes for municipal purposes, or independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational
purposes. The homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall be in lieu
of and not in addition to any other homestead exemption applicable to Pickens County school
district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes.
(f) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
The election superintendent of Pickens County shall call and conduct an election as provided
in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of the Pickens County
school district for approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall conduct that
election on the Tuesday following the first Monday in November, 2025, and shall issue the
call and conduct that election as provided by general law. The election superintendent shall
cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once a week for two weeks
immediately preceding the date thereof in the official organ of Pickens County. The ballot
shall have written or printed thereon the words:
H. B. 841
- 3 -

LC 47 3549/AP
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides a homestead exemption from
Pickens County school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes
( ) NO in the amount of $40,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead for
residents of that school district who are 62 years of age or older and whose
income does not exceed $40,000.00?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for
in this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by Pickens County. It shall be
the election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State. The
provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the election superintendent and are not
intended as directory. If the election superintendent fails or refuses to comply with this
section, any elector of the Pickens County school district may apply for a writ of mandamus
to compel the election superintendent to perform his or her duties under this section. If the
court finds that the election superintendent has not complied with this section, the court shall
fashion appropriate relief requiring the election superintendent to call and conduct such
election on the date required by this section or on the next date authorized for special
elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
SECTION 4.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
H. B. 841
- 4 -

LC 47 3549/AP
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 841
- 5 -